Idaho statutes. Title 12 COSTS AND MISCELLANEOUS MATTERS IN CIVIL ACTIONS
Chapter 4
MOTIONS AND ORDERS

Sec.

§ 12-401. Orders and motions, defined. [Repealed.]

§ 12-402. Motions and orders

Where made. [Repealed.]

§ 12-403. Notice of motion. [Repealed.]

§ 12-404. Continuance and transfer of motion. [Repealed.]

§ 12-405. Orders for payment of money

Enforcement. [Repealed.]